Oklahoma, session 2026, SB769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1273.1 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. On or after the effective date of this act, any juvenile


adjudicated delinquent for any violent crime as provided in Section


571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall not be allowed to

Req. No. 1059 Page 1


possess or purchase a firearm until such juvenile reaches twenty-


five (25) years of age.


B. 1. Before a juvenile court accepts a plea of guilty or no


contest from a child who was fourteen (14) years of age or older at


the time of the offense and charged with a violent crime as provided


in subsection A of this section, the court shall notify the juvenile


that he or she will be prohibited from possessing or purchasing a


firearm until he or she reaches twenty-five (25) years of age.


After such notification, the court may accept the plea of guilty or


no contest if the juvenile clearly states on the record that he or


she is aware of the consequences of the adjudication and still


wishes to enter a plea of guilty or no contest.


2. If a juvenile is found by the court to have committed a


violent crime as provided in subsection A of this section, the court


shall notify the juvenile of the prohibition on possessing or


purchasing a firearm until he or she reaches twenty-five (25) years


of age.


3. The clerk of the juvenile court shall promptly submit an


electronic copy of the final disposition of delinquency proceedings


against a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for a violent crime


pursuant to subsection A to the Federal Bureau of Investigation or


its successor agency for the sole purpose of inclusion in the


National Instant Criminal Background Check System database and the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation. The Oklahoma State Bureau

Req. No. 1059 Page 2


of Investigation shall as soon thereafter as is practicable, but in


no case later than ten (10) business days, update the record of the


adjudicated delinquent in any databases that such agencies use or


refer to for the purposes of handgun licensing or make the same


available to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System.


C. 1. Any person subject to the prohibition to possess or


purchase a firearm pursuant to subsection A of this section who is


nineteen (19) years of age or older and at least one (1) year


removed from his or her most recent delinquency adjudication and


completion of any imposed disposition may petition the juvenile


court for reinstatement of his or her rights to possess or purchase


a firearm.


2. In making such determination, the court shall consider the


following:


a. the behavior of the person since the delinquency


adjudication that resulted in his or her inability to


possess or purchase a firearm,


b. the likelihood that the person will engage in future


criminal activity, and


c. any other information deemed relevant by the juvenile


court.


3. A court having criminal jurisdiction may review the juvenile


court’s determination pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection.



Req. No. 1059 Page 3


4. a. If the juvenile court grants a petition for


reinstatement of the person’s ability to possess or


purchase a firearm and such order is not appealed,


then the clerk of the juvenile court shall promptly


submit an electronic copy to the Federal Bureau of


Investigation or its successor agency for the sole


purpose of inclusion in the National Instant Criminal


Background Check System database and the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Investigation. The Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation shall as soon thereafter as is


practicable, but in no case later than ten (10)


business days, update, correct, modify, or remove the


record of the person in any databases that these


agencies use or refer to for the purposes of handgun


licensing, or make available to the National Instant


Criminal Background Check System, and notify the


Federal Bureau of Investigation that the basis for


such record being made available no longer applies.


b. A petitioner or the state may appeal a determination


of the court pursuant to subsection C of this section


to a court having criminal jurisdiction. Such appeal


must be filed within ten (10) business days following


the entry of the juvenile court’s order.



Req. No. 1059 Page 4


c. The court having criminal jurisdiction shall hear the


case de novo.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1059 CN 1/19/2025 5:42:58 AM







































Req. No. 1059 Page 5